Utah statutes.
53C-2-403.   Mineral leases -- Director to establish forms, term, rental,
and royalty.
The director shall establish the:
(1)  form of a mineral lease application;
(2)  form of the lease;
(3)  term of the lease;
(4)  annual rental;
(5)  amount of royalty in addition to or in lieu of rental; and
(6)  basis upon which the royalty shall be computed.
